Illinois, session 104th, HB2419.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 39.2 and 40.1 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/39.2)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1039.2)7    Sec. 39.2. Local siting review. 8    (a) The county board of the county or the governing body of 9the municipality, as determined by paragraph (c) of Section 39 10of this Act, shall approve or disapprove the request for local 11siting approval for each pollution control facility which is 12subject to such review. An applicant for local siting approval 13shall submit sufficient details describing the proposed 14facility and evidence to demonstrate compliance, and local 15siting approval shall be granted only if the proposed facility 16meets the following criteria:17        (i) the facility is necessary to accommodate the waste 18    needs of the area it is intended to serve;19        (ii) the facility is so designed, located and proposed 20    to be operated that the public health, safety and welfare 21    will be protected;22        (iii) the facility is located so as to minimize 23    incompatibility with the character of the surrounding area   HB2419 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09346 BDA 19404 b1    and to minimize the effect on the value of the surrounding 2    property;3        (iv) (A) for a facility other than a sanitary landfill 4    or waste disposal site, the facility is located outside 5    the boundary of the 100 year flood plain or the site is 6    flood-proofed; (B) for a facility that is a sanitary 7    landfill or waste disposal site, the facility is located 8    outside the boundary of the 100-year floodplain, or if the 9    facility is a facility described in subsection (b)(3) of 10    Section 22.19a, the site is flood-proofed;11        (v) the plan of operations for the facility is 12    designed to minimize the danger to the surrounding area 13    from fire, spills, or other operational accidents;14        (vi) the traffic patterns to or from the facility are 15    so designed as to minimize the impact on existing traffic 16    flows;17        (vii) if the facility will be treating, storing or 18    disposing of hazardous waste, an emergency response plan 19    exists for the facility which includes notification, 20    containment and evacuation procedures to be used in case 21    of an accidental release;22        (viii) if the facility is to be located in a county 23    where the county board has adopted a solid waste 24    management plan consistent with the planning requirements 25    of the Local Solid Waste Disposal Act or the Solid Waste 26    Planning and Recycling Act, the facility is consistent   HB2419 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09346 BDA 19404 b1    with that plan; for purposes of this criterion (viii), the 2    "solid waste management plan" means the plan that is in 3    effect as of the date the application for siting approval 4    is filed; and5        (ix) if the facility will be located within a 6    regulated recharge area, any applicable requirements 7    specified by the Board for such areas have been met.8    The county board or the governing body of the municipality 9may also consider as evidence the previous operating 10experience and past record of convictions or admissions of 11violations of the applicant (and any subsidiary or parent 12corporation) in the field of solid waste management when 13considering criteria (ii) and (v) under this Section.14    If the facility is subject to the location restrictions in 15Section 22.14 of this Act, compliance with that Section shall 16be determined as of the date the application for siting 17approval is filed. 18    (b) No later than 14 days before the date on which the 19county board or governing body of the municipality receives a 20request for site approval, the applicant shall cause written 21notice of such request to be served either in person or by 22registered mail, return receipt requested, on the owners of 23all property within the subject area not solely owned by the 24applicant, and on the owners of all property within 250 feet in 25each direction of the lot line of the subject property, said 26owners being such persons or entities which appear from the   HB2419 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09346 BDA 19404 b1authentic tax records of the County in which such facility is 2to be located; provided, that the number of all feet occupied 3by all public roads, streets, alleys and other public ways 4shall be excluded in computing the 250 feet requirement; 5provided further, that in no event shall this requirement 6exceed 400 feet, including public streets, alleys and other 7public ways.8    Such written notice shall also be served upon members of 9the General Assembly from the legislative district in which 10the proposed facility is located and shall be published in a 11newspaper of general circulation published in the county in 12which the site is located.13    Such notice shall state the name and address of the 14applicant, the location of the proposed site, the nature and 15size of the development, the nature of the activity proposed, 16the probable life of the proposed activity, the date when the 17request for site approval will be submitted, and a description 18of the right of persons to comment on such request as hereafter 19provided.20    (c) An applicant shall file a copy of its request with the 21county board of the county or the governing body of the 22municipality in which the proposed site is located. The 23request shall include (i) the substance of the applicant's 24proposal and (ii) all documents, if any, submitted as of that 25date to the Agency pertaining to the proposed facility, except 26trade secrets as determined under Section 7.1 of this Act. All   HB2419 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09346 BDA 19404 b1such documents or other materials on file with the county 2board or governing body of the municipality shall be made 3available for public inspection at the office of the county 4board or the governing body of the municipality and may be 5copied upon payment of the actual cost of reproduction.6    Any person may file written comment with the county board 7or governing body of the municipality concerning the 8appropriateness of the proposed site for its intended purpose. 9The county board or governing body of the municipality shall 10consider any comment received or postmarked not later than 30 11days after the date of the last public hearing.12    (d) At least one public hearing, at which an applicant 13shall present at least one witness to testify subject to 14cross-examination, is to be held by the county board or 15governing body of the municipality no sooner than 90 days but 16no later than 120 days after the date on which it received the 17request for site approval. No later than 14 days prior to such 18hearing, notice shall be published in a newspaper of general 19circulation published in the county of the proposed site, and 20delivered by certified mail to all members of the General 21Assembly from the district in which the proposed site is 22located, to the governing authority of every municipality 23contiguous to the proposed site or contiguous to the 24municipality in which the proposed site is to be located, to 25the county board of the county where the proposed site is to be 26located, if the proposed site is located within the boundaries   HB2419 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09346 BDA 19404 b1of a municipality, and to the Agency. Members or 2representatives of the governing authority of a municipality 3contiguous to the proposed site or contiguous to the 4municipality in which the proposed site is to be located and, 5if the proposed site is located in a municipality, members or 6representatives of the county board of a county in which the 7proposed site is to be located may appear at and participate in 8public hearings held pursuant to this Section. The public 9hearing shall develop a record sufficient to form the basis of 10appeal of the decision in accordance with Section 40.1 of this 11Act. The fact that a member of the county board or governing 12body of the municipality has publicly expressed an opinion on 13an issue related to a site review proceeding shall not 14preclude the member from taking part in the proceeding and 15voting on the issue.16    (d-5) The county board of the county or governing body of 17the municipality shall conduct the hearing required under 18subsection (d) in a manner that is accessible to the public, 19including, but not limited to, individuals with disabilities 20and individuals who are not native speakers of English. Upon 21completion of the hearing, the county board of the county or 22the governing body of the municipality shall certify 23compliance with the requirements of this subsection as a part 24of the written record of the hearing. The inclusion of the 25certification described in this subsection in the written 26record of the hearing shall constitute prima facie evidence of   HB2419 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09346 BDA 19404 b1compliance with the requirements of this subsection, and an 2allegation or claim of noncompliance with this subsection 3shall not serve as the basis for an appeal of siting approval 4under Section 40.1. 5    (e) Decisions of the county board or governing body of the 6municipality are to be in writing, confirming a public hearing 7was held with testimony from at least one witness presented by 8the applicant, specifying the reasons for the decision, such 9reasons to be in conformance with subsection (a) of this 10Section. In granting approval for a site the county board or 11governing body of the municipality may impose such conditions 12as may be reasonable and necessary to accomplish the purposes 13of this Section and as are not inconsistent with regulations 14promulgated by the Board. Such decision shall be available for 15public inspection at the office of the county board or 16governing body of the municipality and may be copied upon 17payment of the actual cost of reproduction. If there is no 18final action by the county board or governing body of the 19municipality within 180 days after the date on which it 20received the request for site approval, the applicant may deem 21the request approved.22    At the public hearing, at any time prior to completion by 23the applicant of the presentation of the applicant's factual 24evidence, testimony, and an opportunity for cross-examination 25by the county board or governing body of the municipality and 26any participants, the applicant may file not more than one   HB2419 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09346 BDA 19404 b1amended application upon payment of additional fees pursuant 2to subsection (k); in which case the time limitation for final 3action set forth in this subsection (e) shall be extended for 4an additional period of 90 days.5    If, prior to making a final local siting decision, a 6county board or governing body of a municipality has 7negotiated and entered into a host agreement with the local 8siting applicant, the terms and conditions of the host 9agreement, whether written or oral, shall be disclosed and 10made a part of the hearing record for that local siting 11proceeding. In the case of an oral agreement, the disclosure 12shall be made in the form of a written summary jointly prepared 13and submitted by the county board or governing body of the 14municipality and the siting applicant and shall describe the 15terms and conditions of the oral agreement.16    (e-5) Siting approval obtained pursuant to this Section is 17transferable and may be transferred to a subsequent owner or 18operator. In the event that siting approval has been 19transferred to a subsequent owner or operator, that subsequent 20owner or operator assumes and takes subject to any and all 21conditions imposed upon the prior owner or operator by the 22county board of the county or governing body of the 23municipality pursuant to subsection (e). However, any such 24conditions imposed pursuant to this Section may be modified by 25agreement between the subsequent owner or operator and the 26appropriate county board or governing body. Further, in the   HB2419 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09346 BDA 19404 b1event that siting approval obtained pursuant to this Section 2has been transferred to a subsequent owner or operator, that 3subsequent owner or operator assumes all rights and 4obligations and takes the facility subject to any and all 5terms and conditions of any existing host agreement between 6the prior owner or operator and the appropriate county board 7or governing body.8    (f) A local siting approval granted under this Section 9shall expire at the end of 2 calendar years from the date upon 10which it was granted, unless the local siting approval granted 11under this Section is for a sanitary landfill operation, in 12which case the approval shall expire at the end of 3 calendar 13years from the date upon which it was granted, and unless 14within that period the applicant has made application to the 15Agency for a permit to develop the site. In the event that the 16local siting decision has been appealed, such expiration 17period shall be deemed to begin on the date upon which the 18appeal process is concluded.19    Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, upon the 20expiration of a development permit under subsection (k) of 21Section 39, any associated local siting approval granted for 22the facility under this Section shall also expire.23    If a first development permit for a municipal waste 24incineration facility expires under subsection (k) of Section 2539 after September 30, 1989 due to circumstances beyond the 26control of the applicant, any associated local siting approval   HB2419 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09346 BDA 19404 b1granted for the facility under this Section may be used to 2fulfill the local siting approval requirement upon application 3for a second development permit for the same site, provided 4that the proposal in the new application is materially the 5same, with respect to the criteria in subsection (a) of this 6Section, as the proposal that received the original siting 7approval, and application for the second development permit is 8made before January 1, 1990.9    (g) The siting approval procedures, criteria and appeal 10procedures provided for in this Act for new pollution control 11facilities shall be the exclusive siting procedures and rules 12and appeal procedures for facilities subject to such 13procedures. Local zoning or other local land use requirements 14shall not be applicable to such siting decisions.15    (h) Nothing in this Section shall apply to any existing or 16new pollution control facility located within the corporate 17limits of a municipality with a population of over 1,000,000.18    (i) (Blank.)19    The Board shall adopt regulations establishing the 20geologic and hydrologic siting criteria necessary to protect 21usable groundwater resources which are to be followed by the 22Agency in its review of permit applications for new pollution 23control facilities. Such regulations, insofar as they apply to 24new pollution control facilities authorized to store, treat or 25dispose of any hazardous waste, shall be at least as stringent 26as the requirements of the Resource Conservation and Recovery   HB2419 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 09346 BDA 19404 b1Act and any State or federal regulations adopted pursuant 2thereto.3    (j) Any new pollution control facility which has never 4obtained local siting approval under the provisions of this 5Section shall be required to obtain such approval after a 6final decision on an appeal of a permit denial.7    (k) A county board or governing body of a municipality may 8charge applicants for siting review under this Section a 9reasonable fee to cover the reasonable and necessary costs 10incurred by such county or municipality in the siting review 11process.12    (l) The governing Authority as determined by subsection 13(c) of Section 39 of this Act may request the Department of 14Transportation to perform traffic impact studies of proposed 15or potential locations for required pollution control 16facilities, including studies of the emissions associated with 17traffic. The Department of Transportation may charge a fee to 18cover the costs of the emissions study. 19    (m) An applicant may not file a request for local siting 20approval which is substantially the same as a request which 21was disapproved pursuant to a finding against the applicant 22under any of criteria (i) through (ix) of subsection (a) of 23this Section within the preceding 2 years.24    (n) In any review proceeding of a decision of the county 25board or governing body of a municipality made pursuant to the 26local siting review process, the petitioner in the review   HB2419 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 09346 BDA 19404 b1proceeding shall pay to the county or municipality the cost of 2preparing and certifying the record of proceedings. Should the 3petitioner in the review proceeding fail to make payment, the 4provisions of Section 3-109 of the Code of Civil Procedure 5shall apply.6    In the event the petitioner is a citizens' group that 7participated in the siting proceeding and is so located as to 8be affected by the proposed facility, such petitioner shall be 9exempt from paying the costs of preparing and certifying the 10record.11    (o) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 12transfer station used exclusively for landscape waste, where 13landscape waste is held no longer than 24 hours from the time 14it was received, is not subject to the requirements of local 15siting approval under this Section, but is subject only to 16local zoning approval.17(Source: P.A. 100-382, eff. 8-25-17.)